Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,253
Trucks; rearview mirror.

Each truck shall be equipped with a rearview mirror which shall be kept clean, repaired, and installed.

Laws 1933, c. 105, § 5, p. 426;

Laws 1939, c. 47, § 1, p. 208;

Laws 1941, c. 125, § 2, p. 481;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1193;

R.S.1943, § 39-723;

Laws 1947, c. 147, § 2(5), p. 406;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-723.04;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,123;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 349;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 25.